Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2024, chapter 125, article 1, section 47, is amended to read: Sec. 47. DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER; PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL-TO-HOME TRANSITION PILOT PROGRAM. (a) The commissioner of human services must award a single competitive grant to a home care nursing provider to develop and implement, in coordination with the commissioner of health, Fairview Masonic Children's Hospital, Gillette Children's Specialty Healthcare, and Children's Minnesota of St. Paul and Minneapolis, a pilot program to expedite and facilitate pediatric hospital-to-home discharges for patients receiving services in this state under medical assistance, including under the community alternative care waiver, community access for disability inclusion waiver, and developmental disabilities waiver. (b) Grant money awarded under this section must be used only to support the administrative, training, and auxiliary services necessary to reduce: (1) delayed discharge days due to unavailability of home care nursing staffing to accommodate complex pediatric patients; (2) avoidable rehospitalization days for pediatric patients; (3) unnecessary emergency department utilization by pediatric patients following discharge; (4) long-term nursing needs for pediatric patients; and (5) the number of school days missed by pediatric patients. (c) Grant money must not be used to supplant payment rates for services covered under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 256B. (d) No later than deleted text begin December 15, 2026deleted text end new text begin October 15, 2027new text end , the commissioner must prepare a report summarizing the impact of the pilot program that includes but is not limited to: (1) the number of delayed discharge days eliminated; (2) the number of rehospitalization days eliminated; (3) the number of unnecessary emergency department admissions eliminated; (4) the number of missed school days eliminated; and (5) an estimate of the return on investment of the pilot program. (e) The commissioner must submit the report under paragraph (d) to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and human services finance and policy.